src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
	
! ========================================================================== !
!! Totanac verb stems                           
! ========================================================================== !



LEXICON Verbs
IndicativeI ;
IndicativeT ;

LEXICON IndicativeI

< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:k "@U.verb.1sgindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ; !"
<             "@U.verb.2sgindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ; !"
<             "@U.verb.3sgindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ;  !"    
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:k "@U.verb.1plindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ;  !" exclusive Pl
<             "@U.verb.12plindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ; !"
<             "@U.verb.2plindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ; !"
< 0:t 0:a     "@U.verb.3plindep@" "@U.tense.prs@" > ISTEM ; !"


< 0:x 0:a 0:ˈ 0:k "@U.verb.1sgindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ; !"
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:x     "@U.verb.2sgindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ; !"
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:x         "@U.verb.3sgindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ;  !"    
< 0:x 0:a 0:ˈ 0:k "@U.verb.1plindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ;  !" exclusive Pl
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:x     "@U.verb.12plindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ; !"
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:x      "@U.verb.2plindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ; !"
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:x 0:t 0:a  "@U.verb.3plindep@" "@U.tense.prt@" > ISTEM ; !"

LEXICON IndicativeT

<  0:i 0:ˈ 0:k     "@U.verb.1sgosgindep@" > TSTEM ; !"
<  0:i 0:ˈ 0:k 0:a "@U.verb.1sgoplindep@" > TSTEM ; !"
<  0:k 0:i         "@U.verb.2sg1sgindep@"  > TSTEM ; !"
<                  "@U.verb.2sg3sgindep@"  > TSTEM ; !"
<              "@U.verb.3sgoindep@"  > TSTEM ;   !"   
< 0:i 0:ˈ 0:k "@U.verb.1ploindep@" > TSTEM ;  ! exclusive Pl
<              "@U.verb.12ploindep@" > TSTEM ; !"
<              "@U.verb.2ploindep@"  > TSTEM ; !"
< 0:t 0:a      "@U.verb.3ploindep@" > TSTEM ; !"


LEXICON ISTEM
taxtú:taxtú iind ;
tojó iind ;

LEXICON TSTEM
muˈsúː transind ;
